California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
No contract shall be executed with an employer that will initiate employment by persons committed to the authority in the same job classification as other employees of the same employer who, at the time of execution of the contract, are on strike, as defined in Section 1132.6 of the Labor Code, or who are then subject to lockout, as defined in Section 1132.8 of the Labor Code. The total daily hours worked by persons committed to the authority and employed in the same job classification as other employees of the same employer who, subsequent to the employer’s hiring of persons committed to the authority, go on strike, as defined in Section 1132.6 of the Labor Code, or are subjected to a lockout, as defined in Section 1132.8 of the Labor Code, shall not exceed, for the duration of the strike or lockout, the average daily hours worked for the preceding six months, or, if the authority’s contract with the employer has been in operation for less than six months, the average for the period of operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.7.

(a) Any person committed to the authority who escapes or attempts to escape from the institution or facility in which he or she is confined, who escapes or attempts to escape while being conveyed to or from such an institution or facility, who escapes or attempts to escape while outside or away from such an institution or facility under custody of Youth Authority officials, officers, or employees, or who, with intent to abscond from the custody of the Youth Authority, fails to return to such an institution or facility at the prescribed time while outside or away from the institution or facility on furlough or temporary release, is guilty of a felony.

(b) Any offense set forth in
 subdivision (a) which is accomplished by force or violence is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of two, four, or six years. Any offense set forth in subdivision (a) which is accomplished without force or violence is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a term of 16 months, two or three years or in the county jail not exceeding one year.

(c) For purposes of this section, “committed to the authority” means a commitment to the Youth Authority pursuant to Section 731 or 1731.5; a remand to the custody of the Youth Authority pursuant to Section 707.2; a placement at the Youth Authority pursuant to Section 704, 1731.6, or 1753.1; or a transfer to the custody of the Youth Authority pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1731.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 621.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.8.

(a) An assault or battery by any person confined in an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority upon the person of any individual who is not confined therein shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(b) An assault by any person confined in an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority upon the person of any individual who is not confined therein, with a deadly weapon or instrument, or by any means of force likely to produce great bodily injury, is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.85.

(a) Every person confined under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority who commits a battery by gassing upon the person of any peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or employee of the institution is guilty of aggravated battery and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(b) For purposes of this section, “gassing” means intentionally placing or throwing, or causing to be placed or thrown, upon the person of another, any human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily substances or any
 mixture containing human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily substances that results in actual contact with the person’s skin or membranes.

(c) The person in charge of the institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority shall use every available means to immediately investigate all reported or suspected violations of subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the use of forensically acceptable means of preserving and testing the suspected gassing substance to confirm the presence of human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily substances. If there is probable cause to believe that a ward has violated subdivision (a), the chief medical officer of the institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority, or his or her designee, may, when he or she deems it medically necessary to protect the health of an officer or employee who may have been subject to a violation of this section,
 order the ward to receive an examination or test for hepatitis or tuberculosis or both hepatitis and tuberculosis on either a voluntary or involuntary basis immediately after the event, and periodically thereafter as determined to be necessary by the medical officer in order to ensure that further hepatitis or tuberculosis transmission does not occur. These decisions shall be consistent with an occupational exposure as defined by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention. The results of any examination or test shall be provided to the officer or employee who has been subject to a reported or suspected violation of this section. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to otherwise supersede the operation of Title 8 (commencing with Section 7500). Any person performing tests, transmitting test results, or disclosing information pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any action taken in accordance with this section.

(d) The person in charge of the institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority shall refer all reports for which there is probable cause to believe that the inmate has violated subdivision (a) to the local district attorney for prosecution.

(e) The Department of the Youth Authority shall report to the Legislature, by January 1, 2003, its findings and recommendations on gassing incidents at the department’s facilities and the medical testing authorized by this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The total number of gassing incidents at each youth correctional facility up to the date of the report.

(2) The disposition of each gassing incident, including the administrative penalties imposed, the number of incidents that are
 prosecuted, and the results of those prosecutions, including any penalties imposed.

(3) A profile of the wards who commit the batteries by gassing, including the number of wards who have one or more prior serious or violent felony convictions.

(4) Efforts that the department has taken to limit these incidents, including staff training and the use of protective clothing and goggles.

(5) The results and costs of the medical testing authorized by this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under both this section and any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 622.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person under the jurisdiction or control of the Department of the Youth Authority is obligated to submit to a test for the probable causative agent of AIDS upon a determination of the chief medical officer of the facility that clinical symptoms of AIDS or AIDS-related complex, as recognized by the Centers for Disease Control, is present in the person. In the event that the subject of the test refuses to submit to such a test, the department may seek a court order to require him or her to submit to the test.

(b) Prior to ordering a test pursuant to subdivision (a), the chief medical officer shall ensure that the subject of the test receives pretest counseling. The counseling shall include:

(1) Testing procedures, effectiveness, reliability, and confidentiality.

(2) The mode of transmission of HIV.

(3) Symptoms of AIDS and AIDS-related complex.

(4) Precautions to avoid exposure and transmission.

The chief medical officer shall also encourage the subject of the test to undergo voluntary testing prior to ordering a test. The chief medical officer shall also ensure that the subject of the test receives posttest counseling.

(c) The following procedures shall apply to testing conducted under this section:

(1) The withdrawal of blood shall be performed in a medically approved manner. Only a physician, registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, licensed medical technician, or licensed phlebotomist may withdraw blood specimens for the purposes of this section.

(2) The chief medical officer shall order that the blood specimens be transmitted to a licensed medical laboratory which has been approved by the State Department of Health Services for the conducting of AIDS testing, and that tests, including all readily available confirmatory tests, be conducted thereon for medically accepted indications of exposure to or infection with HIV.

(3) The subject of the test shall be notified face-to-face as to the results of the test.

(d) All counseling and notification of test results shall be conducted by one of the following:

(1) A physician and surgeon who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b).

(2) A registered nurse who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b).

(3) A psychologist who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b) and who is under the purview of either a registered nurse or physician and surgeon who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b).

(4) A licensed social worker who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b) and who is under the purview of either a registered nurse or physician and surgeon who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b).

(5) A trained volunteer counselor who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b) and who is under the supervision of either a registered nurse or physician and surgeon who has received training in the subjects described in subdivision (b).

(e) The Department of the Youth Authority shall provide medical services appropriate for the diagnosis and treatment of those infected with HIV.

(f) The Department of the Youth Authority may operate separate housing facilities for wards and inmates who have tested positive for HIV infection and who continue to engage in activities which transmit HIV. These facilities shall be comparable to those of other wards and inmates with access to recreational and educational facilities, commensurate with the facilities available in the institution.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the chief medical officer of a facility of the Department of the Youth Authority may do all of the following:

(1) Disclose results of a test for the probable causative agent of AIDS to the superintendent or administrator of the facility where the test subject is confined.

(2) When test results are positive, inform the test subject’s known sexual partners or needle contacts in a Department of the Youth Authority facility of the positive results, provided that the test subject’s identity is kept confidential. All wards and inmates who are provided with this information shall be provided with the counseling described in subdivision (b).

(3) Include the test results in the subject’s confidential medical record which is to be maintained separate from other case files and records.

(h) Actions taken pursuant to this section shall not be subject to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code. In addition, the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 120990 of the Health and Safety Code shall not apply to testing performed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 459.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.10.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Youth Authority Board may require a person under its jurisdiction or control to submit to an examination or test for tuberculosis when the board reasonably suspects that the parolee has, has had, or has been exposed to, tuberculosis in an infectious stage. For purposes of this section, an “examination or test for tuberculosis” means testing and followup examinations or treatment according to the Centers for Disease Control and the American Thoracic Society recommendations in effect at the time of the initial examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 40.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1769.

(a) A person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, by a juvenile court shall, except as provided in subdivision (b), be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control or when he or she attains 21 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800).

(b) A
 person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, by a juvenile court and who has been found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b)
 of Section 707, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control or when he or she attains 25 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person who is committed by a juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities,
 on or after July 1, 2012, who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the
 commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when he or she attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800). This subdivision does not apply to persons committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, by a juvenile court prior to July 1, 2012, pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) (1) A person committed by a juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, on or after July 1, 2018, who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code or subdivision (b) of Section 707, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, of when he or she attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800). This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, a state hospital, or another appropriate public or private mental health facility, by a juvenile court prior to July 1, 2018, pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c).

(2) A person who at the time of adjudication of a crime or crimes would, in criminal court, have faced an aggregate sentence of seven years or more, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 25 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or to a person who is confined in a state hospital or other appropriate public or private mental health facility, by a court prior to July 1, 2018, as described in subdivision (b).

(e) The amendments to this section made by
 Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2012 apply retroactively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 36.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1770.

Every person convicted of a misdemeanor and committed to the authority shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control or when the person reaches his 23d birthday, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1693.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

(a) A person who is convicted of a felony and committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, shall be discharged when he or she attains 25 years of age, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) or unless a petition is filed under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1780). If a petition
 under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1780) is filed, the division shall retain control until the final disposition of the proceeding under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1780).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who is committed by a juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, on or after July 1, 2012, and who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the
 commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800). This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation,
 Division of Juvenile Facilities, by a juvenile court prior to July 1, 2012, pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) or (b), a person who is committed by the juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, on or after July 1, 2018, and who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code or subdivision (b) of Section 707 of this code, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(2) A person who at the time of adjudication of a crime or crimes would, in criminal court, have faced an aggregate sentence of seven years or more, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 25 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or to a person who is confined in a state hospital or other appropriate public or private mental health facility by a court prior to July 1, 2018, pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2012 shall apply retroactively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 37.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1772.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), every person discharged by the Board of Juvenile Hearings may petition the court that committed him or her, and the court may upon that petition set aside the verdict of guilty and dismiss the accusation or information against the petitioner who shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime for which he or she was committed, including, but not limited to, penalties or disabilities that affect access to education, employment, or occupational licenses.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply to a person described in subdivision (a) or a person honorably
 discharged by the Board of Juvenile Hearings:

(1) The person shall not be eligible for appointment as a peace officer employed by any public agency if that person’s appointment would otherwise be prohibited by Section 1029 of the Government Code. However, that person may be appointed and employed as a peace officer by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities if (A) at least five years have passed since the person’s honorable discharge, and the person has had no misdemeanor or felony convictions except for traffic misdemeanors since he or she was honorably discharged by the Board of Juvenile Hearings, or (B) the person was employed as a peace officer by the Division of Juvenile Facilities on or before January 1, 1983. A person who is under the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities
 or a county probation department shall not be admitted to an examination for a peace officer position with the Division of Juvenile Facilities unless and until the person has been honorably discharged from the jurisdiction of the Board of Juvenile Hearings pursuant to Sections 1177 and 1719.

(2) The person is subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(3) The conviction of the person for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 is admissible in a subsequent criminal, juvenile, or civil proceeding if otherwise admissible, if all of the following are true:

(A) The person was 16 years of age or older at the time he or she committed the offense.

(B) The person was found unfit to be dealt with under the juvenile court law pursuant to Section 707 because he or she was alleged to have committed an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(C) The person was tried as an adult and convicted of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(D) The person was committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities for the offense referred to in subparagraph (C).

(4) The conviction of the person may be used
 to enhance the punishment for a subsequent offense.

(5) The conviction of a person who is 18 years of age or older at the time he or she committed the offense is admissible in a subsequent civil, criminal, or juvenile proceeding, if otherwise admissible pursuant to law.

(c) Every person discharged from control by the Board of Juvenile Hearings shall be informed of the provisions of this section in writing at the time of discharge.

(d) “Honorably discharged” as used in this section means and includes every person who was granted an honorable discharge by the Board of Juvenile Hearings pursuant to Sections 1177 and 1719.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 683, Sec. 9.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.

(a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an individual committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Individuals found to be pregnant and desiring abortions shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion.

(b) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in
 at least one conspicuous place to which all committed persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 25.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1774.

(a) A female who has been committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities shall have the right to summon and receive the services of a physician and surgeon of her choice in order to determine whether she is pregnant. The director may adopt reasonable rules and regulations with regard to the conduct of examinations to effectuate that determination.

(b) If she is found to be pregnant, she is entitled to a determination of the extent of the medical services needed by her and to the receipt of those services from the physician and surgeon of her choice. Expenses occasioned by the services of a physician and surgeon whose services are not provided by the facility shall be borne by the female.

(c) A ward who gives birth while under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or a community treatment program has the right to the following services:

(1) Prenatal care.

(2) Access to prenatal vitamins.

(3) Childbirth education.

(d) A ward who is known to be pregnant or in recovery after delivery shall not be restrained except as provided by Section 3407 of the Penal Code.

(e) A physician providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate to engage in the practice of medicine issued pursuant to Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) The rights provided to females by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all female wards have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 726, Sec. 5.   (AB 2530)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1776.

Whenever an alleged parole violator is detained in a county detention facility pursuant to a valid exercise of the powers of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as specified in Sections 1753, 1755, and 1767.3 and when such detention is initiated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and is related solely to a violation of the conditions of parole and is not related to a new criminal charge, the county shall be reimbursed for the costs of such detention by the Department of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. Such reimbursement shall be expended for maintenance, upkeep, and improvement of juvenile hall and jail conditions, facilities, and services. Before the county is reimbursed by the department, the total amount of all charges against that county authorized by law for services rendered by the department shall be first deducted from the gross amount of the reimbursement authorized by this section. Such net reimbursement shall be calculated and paid monthly by the department. The department shall withhold all or part of such net reimbursement to a county whose juvenile hall or jail facility or facilities do not conform to minimum standards for local detention facilities as authorized by Section 6030 of the Penal Code or Section 210 of this code.

“Costs of such detention,” as used in this section, shall include the same cost factors as are utilized by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in determining the cost of prisoner care in state correctional facilities.

No city, county, or other jurisdiction may file, and the state may not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 28.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.

Any moneys received pursuant to the Federal Social Security Act by a ward who is incarcerated by the Youth Authority are liable for the reasonable costs of the ward’s support and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 936, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.

Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a parole hearing or other adjudication concerning rights of a person committed to the control of the Youth Authority conducted by the Department of the Youth Authority or the Youth Authority Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 42.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Commitment to State Prison After Expiration of Control [1780. - 1783.]

1780.

If the date of discharge occurs before the expiration of a period of control equal to the maximum term prescribed by law for the offense of which he or she was convicted, and if the Department of the Youth Authority believes that unrestrained freedom for that person would be dangerous to the public, the Department of the Youth Authority shall petition the court by which the commitment was made.

The petition shall be accompanied by a written statement of the facts upon which the department bases its opinion that discharge from its control at the time stated would be dangerous to the public, but a petition may not be dismissed merely because of its form or an asserted insufficiency of its allegations; every order shall be reviewed upon its merits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 43.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1781.

Upon the filing of a petition under this article, the court shall notify the person whose liberty is involved, and if he or she is a minor, his or her parent or guardian if practicable, of the application and shall afford him or her an opportunity to appear in court with the aid of counsel and of process to compel attendance of witnesses and production of evidence. When he or she is unable to provide his or her own counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent him or her.

In the case of any person who is the subject of such a petition and who is under the control of the Youth Authority for the commission of any offense of rape in violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 262 or subdivision (2) or subdivision (3) of Section 261 of the Penal Code, or murder, the Department of the Youth Authority shall send written notice of the petition and of any hearing set for the petition to each of the following persons: the attorney for the person who is the subject of the petition, the district attorney of the county from which the person was committed, and the law enforcement agency that investigated the case. The department shall also send written notice to the victim of the rape or the next of kin of the person murdered if he or she requests notice from the department and keeps it apprised of his or her current mailing address. Notice shall be sent at least 30 days before the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 44.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1782.

Such committing court may thereupon discharge the person, admit him or her to probation or may commit him or her to the state prison. The maximum term of imprisonment for a person committed to a state prison under this section shall be a period equal to the maximum term prescribed by law for the offense of which he or she was convicted less the period during which he or she was under the control of the Youth Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

1783.

An appeal may be taken from the order of the court committing a person to the State prison under this chapter in the same manner as appeals are taken from convictions in the criminal cases under the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 937.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.2. Juvenile Justice Community Resource Programs [1784. - 1784.4.]

1784.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That the mobilization of community resources to assist in providing youthful offenders with necessary educational, psychological, medical, and other services which relate to root causes of delinquency is vital.

(b) That due to increased and heavy caseloads, probation officers cannot be expected to assume the full burden of providing necessary services to youthful offenders.

(c) That addressing the root causes of delinquent behavior in a cost-effective manner yields enormous societal benefits in the prevention of future criminality and the integration of the offender into productive society.

(d) That by encouraging community participation, programs such as the Juvenile Justice Connection Project in Los Angeles County have achieved great success in providing services to young people at a substantial savings to the taxpayer.

(e) That efforts to implement similar projects throughout the state should be encouraged and supported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.1.

(a) The Director of the Youth Authority shall, upon request, provide technical assistance to judges, probation officers, law enforcement officials, school administrators, welfare administrators, and other public and private organizations and citizen groups concerning the development and implementation of juvenile justice community resource programs.

(b) As used in this article, “juvenile justice community resource program” means a program which does both of the following:

(1) Develops a directory or bank of public and private agencies, practitioners, and other community resources to offer services that are needed by youthful offenders, including, but not limited to, medical, psychological, educational, recreational, and vocational services.

(2) Provides diagnostic screening for youthful offenders referred to the program and matches the offender with a provider of services.

(c) As used in this article, “youthful offender” means a person described by Section 601 or 602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.2.

(a) The Director of the Youth Authority shall provide grants from funds made available for this purpose, for the development, implementation, and support of juvenile justice community resource programs.

(b) Any public or private nonprofit agency that does not directly deliver services may apply to the director for funding as a juvenile justice community resource program pursuant to this article.

(c) Funding may consist of organizational and program grants.

(1) As used in this article, “organizational grants” means grants for the purpose of funding community organization efforts in order to develop a bank of public and private agencies, and other community resources, to provide services needed by youthful offenders and to provide financial support to the referral program. An applicant may receive only one organizational grant, which may not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(2) As used in this article, “program grants” means grants to support the operating costs of the referral programs. A program grant may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per applicant per year. As a further limitation, beginning in the second year of the program grant, the amount of the program grant may not exceed a prescribed percentage of the referral program’s operating budget, as follows: 50 percent in the second year of the program grant, 33 percent in the third year, 25 percent in the fourth year, and 20 percent in the fifth and subsequent years of the program grant.

(d) The director shall consider all of the following factors, together with any other circumstances he or she deems appropriate, in selecting applicants to receive funds pursuant to this article.

(1) The stated goals of applicants.

(2) The number of youthful offenders to be served and the needs of the community.

(3) Evidence of community support, including, but not limited to, business, labor, professional, educational, charitable, and social service groups.

(e) In addition to the factors specified in subdivision (d), in selecting applicants to receive program grants, the director shall also consider all of the following:

(1) Description of the number and type of service providers available.

(2) Existence of support and involvement by participants in the local juvenile justice system, including law enforcement, probation, prosecution, and the judiciary.

(3) The organizational structure of the agency which will operate the program.

(4) Specific plans for meeting the percentage of local funding of operating costs as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(f) After consultation with the advisory committee, and upon evaluation of all applicants pursuant to the above criteria and any other criteria established by the advisory committee, the director shall select the public or private nonprofit agencies which he or she deems qualified to receive funds for the establishment and operation of the programs.

(g) The initial evaluation, selection, and funding of applicants shall take place prior to January 1, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 711, Sec. 139.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.3.

The Director of the Youth Authority shall appoint an eight-member advisory committee on community resource referral programs to advise him or her on matters relating to this article. Committee members shall include representatives of business, labor, professional, charitable, educational, and social service groups, as well as those working within the juvenile justice system. The members of the committee shall be entitled to their reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.4.

The director may accept funds and grants from any source, public or private, to assist in accomplishing the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------


